Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-101
State name.

The State of Nebraska shall hereafter, in a popular sense, be known and referred to as the Cornhusker State.

Laws 1945, c. 256, § 1, p. 796;

R.R.S.1943, § 84-713.01.